Hawaii statutes.
[PART X.]
GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE BONDS

[§269-161] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Ancillary agreement" means any bond
insurance policy, letter of credit, reserve account, surety bond, swap
arrangement, hedging arrangement, liquidity or credit support arrangement, or
other related bond document or other similar agreement or arrangement entered
into in connection with the issuance of bonds that is designed to promote the
credit quality and marketability of the bonds or to mitigate the risk of an increase
in interest rates.

"Authority" means the Hawaii green
infrastructure authority established under section 196-63.

"Bond" or "green infrastructure
bond" means any bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness that is
issued by the State, acting through the department, under a financing order,
the proceeds of which are used directly or indirectly to recover, finance, or
refinance financing costs of clean energy technology, demand response
technology, and energy use reduction and demand side management infrastructure,
programs, and services, and that are secured by or payable from green
infrastructure property.

"Bondholder" means any holder or
owner of a bond.

"Clean energy technology" means any
technology as defined in section 269-121(b).

"Department" means the department of
business, economic development, and tourism, or any successor by law.

"Electric utilities" means all
electric utilities subject to billing, collecting, and remitting the public
benefits fee, or the green infrastructure fee, at the time the financing order
becomes final, and any other electric utility designated in the financing
order.

"Financing costs" means any of the
following:

(1) Principal and interest payable on bonds;

(2) Any payment required under an ancillary
agreement;

(3) Any amount required to fund or replenish a
reserve account or another account established under any indenture, ancillary
agreement, or other financing document relating to the issuance of bonds;

(4) Any redemption or call premium or cost of
redeeming or refunding any existing debt of the department in connection with
either the issuance of, or the use of proceeds from, bonds;

(5) Any costs incurred by the department to modify or
amend any indenture, financing agreement, security agreement, or similar agreement
or instrument securing any bond or any ancillary agreement;

(6) Any costs incurred by the department to obtain
any consent, release, waiver, or approval from any bondholder or of any party
to an ancillary agreement that are necessary to be incurred for the department
to issue bonds;

(7) Any costs related to issuing or servicing bonds
or related to obtaining a financing order, including servicing fees and
expenses, trustee fees and expenses, legal, accounting, or other professional
fees and expenses, administrative fees, placement fees, underwriting fees and
discounts, capitalized interest and equity, and rating-agency fees; or loan
program administration costs as authorized for recovery under a financing order
or orders; or

(8) Any other similar costs incident to the issuance,
administration, or servicing of the bonds that the department finds
appropriate.

"Financing order" means an order
issued at the request of the department by the public utilities commission
under this part that has become final as provided by law, and that authorizes
the issuance of bonds and the imposition, adjustment from time to time, and
collection of green infrastructure fees.

"Financing party" means:

(1) Any trustee, collateral agent, or other person
acting for the benefit of a bondholder; or

(2) Any party to an ancillary agreement, the rights
and obligations of which relate to or depend upon the existence of green
infrastructure property and green infrastructure fees, the enforcement and
priority of a security interest in green infrastructure property, the timely
collection and payment of green infrastructure fees, or a combination of these
factors.

"Green infrastructure bond fund"
means the special fund created pursuant to section 196-67.

"Green infrastructure charge" means
the on-bill charges as defined in section 196-61.

"Green infrastructure fee" means the
nonbypassable fees and charges authorized by section 269-166 and in a financing
order authorized under this part to be imposed on and collected from all existing
and future customers of electric utilities or any successor.

"Green infrastructure loan program
order" means an order issued by the public utilities commission under
section 269-171 that establishes the use or other disposition of amounts
deposited and held in the Hawaii green infrastructure special fund pursuant to
section 196-65.

"Green infrastructure property" means
the property, rights, and interests created by the public utilities commission
under a financing order, including the right to impose, charge, and collect
from electric utility customers the green infrastructure fee that shall be used
to pay and secure the payment of bonds and financing costs, including the right
to obtain adjustments to the green infrastructure fee, and any revenues, receipts,
collections, rights to payment, payments, moneys, claims, or other proceeds
arising from the rights and interests created by the public utilities
commission under any financing order.

"Green infrastructure special fund"
means the special fund created pursuant to section 196-65.

"Successor" means, with respect to
any electric utility, another electric utility or other entity that succeeds
voluntarily or by operation of law to the rights and obligations of the first
electric utility or other entity pursuant to any bankruptcy, reorganization,
restructuring, or other insolvency proceedings; any merger, acquisition, or
consolidation; or any sale or transfer of assets, regardless of how any of
these actions occurred.

"Trustee" means any trustee or fiscal
agent appointed under an indenture or certificate of the director executed in
connection with the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 39-68. [L 2013, c
211, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next